New York, session 2025-2026, S9572.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 701 of the business corporation law, as amended by 2 chapter 432 of the laws of 1977, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 701. Board of directors. 4 Subject to any provision in the certificate of incorporation author- 5 ized by paragraph (b) of section 620 (Agreements as to voting; provision 6 in certificate of incorporation as to control of directors) or by para- 7 graph (b) of section 715 (Officers), the business of a corporation shall 8 be managed under the direction of its board of directors, each of whom 9 shall be at least eighteen years of age, and for any board of directors 10 of a residential cooperative housing corporation incorporated pursuant 11 to this chapter, at least one director shall be a primary resident of 12 such residential cooperative housing corporation. The certificate of 13 incorporation or the by-laws may prescribe other qualifications for 14 directors, and in the case of residential cooperative housing corpo- 15 rations, may require a greater number of directors be primary residents 16 of such residential cooperative housing corporations. 17 § 2. Section 701 of the not-for-profit corporation law is amended by 18 adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 19 (c) For any board of directors of a residential cooperative housing 20 corporation incorporated pursuant to this chapter, at least one director 21 shall be a primary resident of such residential cooperative housing 22 corporation. The certificate of incorporation or the by-laws of such EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14947-02-6 S. 9572 2 1 residential cooperative housing corporations may prescribe other quali- 2 fications for directors including a requirement that a greater number of 3 directors be primary residents of such residential cooperative housing 4 corporations. 5 § 3. Section 238-a of the real property law is amended by adding a 6 new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 7 4. No payments, fees or charges may be charged by a cooperative hous- 8 ing corporation to a tenant that is a dwelling unit owner or shareholder 9 of such cooperative housing corporation unless such payment is described 10 and disclosed to all such cooperative housing corporation's shareholders 11 in writing at least thirty days prior to implementation. 12 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.